Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1415.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 2713(b)(1), (3) and (5), 2713.1(b)(1) and 3124.2(a.6)(1) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 2713. Neglect of care-dependent person.* * *(b) Penalty.--(1) A violation of subsection (a)(1) constitutes a [misdemeanor of the first] felony of the third degree if the victim suffers bodily injury.* * *(3) A violation of subsection (a)(2) constitutes a [misdemeanor of the first] felony of the third degree if the 1234567891011121314151617181920 victim suffers bodily injury.* * *(5) A violation of subsection (a)(3) constitutes a misdemeanor of the [second] first degree, except that where there is a course of conduct of endangering the welfare of a care-dependent person, the offense constitutes a felony of the [third] second degree.* * *§ 2713.1. Abuse of care-dependent person.* * *(b) Penalty.--(1) A violation of subsection (a)(1) constitutes a [misdemeanor of the first] felony of the third degree.* * *§ 3124.2. Institutional sexual assault.* * *(a.6) Caretakers.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) and in sections 3121, 3122.1, 3123, 3124.1 and 3125, a caretaker commits a felony of the [third] second degree if the caretaker engages in sexual intercourse, deviate sexual intercourse or indecent contact with a care-dependent person who receives care, services or treatment in or from a facility.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1415PN1883 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425